Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 4. Line of Duty Act.
§ 9.1-403.
Claim for payment; costs.

Every beneficiary, disabled person or his spouse, or dependent of a deceased or disabled person shall present his claim to the chief officer, or his designee, of the employer for which the disabled or deceased person last worked on forms to be provided by VRS. Upon receipt of a claim, the chief officer or his designee shall forward the claim to VRS within seven days. The Virginia Retirement System shall determine eligibility for benefits under this chapter. The Virginia Retirement System may request assistance in obtaining information necessary to make an eligibility determination from the Department of State Police. The Department of State Police shall take action to conduct the investigation as expeditiously as possible. The Department of State Police shall be reimbursed from the Fund or the nonparticipating employer, as applicable, for the cost of searching for and obtaining information requested by VRS. The Virginia Retirement System shall be reimbursed for the reasonable costs incurred for making eligibility determinations by nonparticipating employers or from the Fund on behalf of participating employers, as applicable. If any nonparticipating employer fails to reimburse VRS for reasonable costs incurred in making an eligibility determination, VRS shall inform the State Comptroller and the affected nonparticipating employer of the delinquent amount. In calculating the delinquent amount, VRS may impose an interest rate of one percent per month of delinquency. The State Comptroller shall forthwith transfer such delinquent amount, plus interest, from any moneys otherwise distributable to such nonparticipating employer.

Within 10 business days of being notified by an employee, or an employee’s representative, that such employee is permanently and totally disabled due to a work-related injury suffered in the line of duty, the agency or department employing the employee shall provide him with information about the continued health insurance coverage provided under this chapter and the process for initiating a claim. The employer shall assist in filing a claim, unless such assistance is waived by the employee or the employee’s representative.
B. 1. Within 10 business days of being notified by an employee, or an employee’s representative, that such employee is permanently and totally disabled due to a work-related injury suffered in the line of duty, the agency or department employing the employee shall provide him with information about the continued health insurance coverage provided under this chapter and the process for initiating a claim. The employer shall assist in filing a claim, unless such assistance is waived by the employee or the employee’s representative.

Within 10 business days of having knowledge that a deceased person’s surviving spouse, dependents, or beneficiaries may be entitled to benefits under this chapter, the employer for which the deceased person last worked shall provide the surviving spouse, dependents, or beneficiaries, as applicable, with information about the benefits provided under this chapter and the process for initiating a claim. The employer shall assist in filing a claim, unless such assistance is waived by the surviving spouse, dependents, or beneficiaries.

Within 30 days of receiving a claim pursuant to subsection A, an employer may submit to VRS any evidence that could assist in determining the eligibility of a claim. However, when the claim involves a presumption under §

65.2-402

or

65.2-402.1

, VRS shall provide an employer additional time to submit evidence as is necessary not to exceed nine months from the date the employer received a claim pursuant to subsection A. Any such evidence submitted by the employer shall be included in the agency record for the claim.

History.

1995, c. 156, § 2.1-133.8; 1998, c. 712; 2001, cc. 427, 844; 2007, c. 90; 2009, cc. 393, 580; 2016, c. 677.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 427 amended former § 2.1-133.8, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 427 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 427, in the third sentence, substituted “Superintendent” for “chief officer,” and substituted “ten business days after completion of the investigation” for “forty-five days of receipt of a claim,” and added the last two sentences.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 90, effective February 23, 2007, added the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 393 and 580 are identical, and divided former subsection A into subsections A and C; added subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection D; and in subsection C, in the first sentence, added “In all other cases, upon receipt of the claim” at the beginning, inserted “of the appropriate division or department” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

§ 9.1-404.
(Effective until July 1, 2023) Order of the Virginia Retirement System.

The Virginia Retirement System shall make an eligibility determination within 45 days of receiving all necessary information for determining eligibility for a claim filed under §

9.1-403

. The Virginia Retirement System may use a medical board pursuant to §

51.1-124.23

in determining eligibility. If benefits under this chapter are due, VRS shall notify the nonparticipating employer, which shall provide the benefits within 15 days of such notice, or VRS shall pay the benefits from the Fund on behalf of the participating employer within 15 days of the determination, as applicable. The payments shall be retroactive to the first date that the disabled person was no longer eligible for health insurance coverage subsidized by his employer.
A. 1. The Virginia Retirement System shall make an eligibility determination within 45 days of receiving all necessary information for determining eligibility for a claim filed under §

9.1-403

. The Virginia Retirement System may use a medical board pursuant to §

51.1-124.23

in determining eligibility. If benefits under this chapter are due, VRS shall notify the nonparticipating employer, which shall provide the benefits within 15 days of such notice, or VRS shall pay the benefits from the Fund on behalf of the participating employer within 15 days of the determination, as applicable. The payments shall be retroactive to the first date that the disabled person was no longer eligible for health insurance coverage subsidized by his employer.

Two years after an individual has been determined to be a disabled person, VRS may require the disabled person to renew the determination through a process established by VRS. If a disabled person refuses to submit to the determination renewal process described in this subdivision, then benefits under this chapter shall cease for the individual, any eligible dependents, and an eligible spouse until the individual complies. If such individual does not comply within six months from the date of the initial request for a renewed determination, then benefits under this chapter shall permanently cease for the individual, any eligible dependents, and an eligible spouse. If VRS issues a renewed determination that an individual is no longer a disabled person, then benefits under this chapter shall permanently cease for the individual, any eligible dependents, and an eligible spouse. If VRS issues a renewed determination that an individual remains a disabled person, then VRS may require the disabled person to renew the determination five years after such renewed determination through a process established by VRS. The Virginia Retirement System may require the disabled person to renew the determination at any time if VRS has information indicating that the person may no longer be disabled.

The Virginia Retirement System shall be reimbursed for all reasonable costs incurred and associated, directly and indirectly, in performing the duties pursuant to this chapter (i) from the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund for costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses on behalf of participating employers and (ii) from a nonparticipating employer for premiums and costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses for which the nonparticipating employer is responsible.

The Virginia Retirement System may develop policies and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1995, cc. 156, 597, § 2.1-133.9; 1998, c. 712; 2001, c. 844; 2016, c. 677; 2017, c. 439.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 439 inserted the second sentence in subdivision A 1.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 484, effective July 1, 2023, added subdivision A 3.

§ 9.1-404.
(Effective July 1, 2023) Order of the Virginia Retirement System.

The Virginia Retirement System shall make an eligibility determination within 45 days of receiving all necessary information for determining eligibility for a claim filed under §

9.1-403

. The Virginia Retirement System may use a medical board pursuant to §

51.1-124.23

in determining eligibility. If benefits under this chapter are due, VRS shall notify the nonparticipating employer, which shall provide the benefits within 15 days of such notice, or VRS shall pay the benefits from the Fund on behalf of the participating employer within 15 days of the determination, as applicable. The payments shall be retroactive to the first date that the disabled person was no longer eligible for health insurance coverage subsidized by his employer.
A. 1. The Virginia Retirement System shall make an eligibility determination within 45 days of receiving all necessary information for determining eligibility for a claim filed under §

9.1-403

. The Virginia Retirement System may use a medical board pursuant to §

51.1-124.23

in determining eligibility. If benefits under this chapter are due, VRS shall notify the nonparticipating employer, which shall provide the benefits within 15 days of such notice, or VRS shall pay the benefits from the Fund on behalf of the participating employer within 15 days of the determination, as applicable. The payments shall be retroactive to the first date that the disabled person was no longer eligible for health insurance coverage subsidized by his employer.

Two years after an individual has been determined to be a disabled person, VRS may require the disabled person to renew the determination through a process established by VRS. If a disabled person refuses to submit to the determination renewal process described in this subdivision, then benefits under this chapter shall cease for the individual, any eligible dependents, and an eligible spouse until the individual complies. If such individual does not comply within six months from the date of the initial request for a renewed determination, then benefits under this chapter shall permanently cease for the individual, any eligible dependents, and an eligible spouse. If VRS issues a renewed determination that an individual is no longer a disabled person, then benefits under this chapter shall permanently cease for the individual, any eligible dependents, and an eligible spouse. If VRS issues a renewed determination that an individual remains a disabled person, then VRS may require the disabled person to renew the determination five years after such renewed determination through a process established by VRS. The Virginia Retirement System may require the disabled person to renew the determination at any time if VRS has information indicating that the person may no longer be disabled.

For any medical review conducted for the purpose of making an eligibility determination pursuant to this section, VRS shall require such review to be conducted by a licensed health practitioner. For purposes of this section, “licensed health practitioner” means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

54.1-2900

et seq.) of Title 54.1, a person licensed to practice nursing pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 30 (§

54.1-3000

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or a person licensed to practice psychology pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 36 (§

54.1-3600

et seq.) of Title 54.1. “Licensed health practitioner” includes a person issued a comparable license, as determined by VRS, by the District of Columbia or a state that is contiguous to the Commonwealth.

The Virginia Retirement System shall be reimbursed for all reasonable costs incurred and associated, directly and indirectly, in performing the duties pursuant to this chapter (i) from the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund for costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses on behalf of participating employers and (ii) from a nonparticipating employer for premiums and costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses for which the nonparticipating employer is responsible.

The Virginia Retirement System may develop policies and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1995, cc. 156, 597, § 2.1-133.9; 1998, c. 712; 2001, c. 844; 2016, c. 677; 2017, c. 439; 2022, c. 484.

§ 9.1-405.
(Effective until July 1, 2023) Appeal from decision of Virginia Retirement System.

Any beneficiary, disabled person or eligible spouse or eligible dependent of a deceased or disabled person aggrieved by the decision of VRS may appeal the decision through a process established by VRS. Any such process may utilize a medical board as described in §

51.1-124.23

. An employer may submit information related to the claim and may participate in any informal fact-finding proceeding that is included in such process established by VRS. Upon completion of the appeal process, the final determination issued by VRS shall constitute a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

. Any beneficiary, disabled person, or eligible spouse or eligible dependent of a deceased or disabled person aggrieved by, and claiming the unlawfulness of, such case decision shall have a right to seek judicial review thereof in accordance with Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. The employer shall not have a right to seek such judicial review.

History.

1995, cc. 156, 597, § 2.1-133.10; 1998, c. 712; 2001, c. 844; 2016, c. 677.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 484, effective July 1, 2023, added “provided that for any medical review conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, each member of such medical board shall be a licensed health practitioner, as defined in §

9.1-404

” in the first sentence at the end; and made a stylistic change.

§ 9.1-405.
(Effective July 1, 2023) Appeal from decision of Virginia Retirement System.

Any beneficiary, disabled person or eligible spouse or eligible dependent of a deceased or disabled person aggrieved by the decision of VRS may appeal the decision through a process established by VRS. Any such process may utilize a medical board as described in §

51.1-124.23

, provided that for any medical review conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, each member of such medical board shall be a licensed health practitioner, as defined in §

9.1-404

. An employer may submit information related to the claim and may participate in any informal fact-finding proceeding that is included in such process established by VRS. Upon completion of the appeal process, the final determination issued by VRS shall constitute a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

. Any beneficiary, disabled person, or eligible spouse or eligible dependent of a deceased or disabled person aggrieved by, and claiming the unlawfulness of, such case decision shall have a right to seek judicial review thereof in accordance with Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. The employer shall not have a right to seek such judicial review.

History.

1995, cc. 156, 597, § 2.1-133.10; 1998, c. 712; 2001, c. 844; 2016, c. 677; 2022, c. 484.

§ 9.1-406.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s note.

Former §

9.1-406

, pertaining to appeals from judgments, derived from 1995, c. 156, § 2.1-133.11; 2001, c. 844; 2005, c. 681.

§ 9.1-407.
Training.

Any employee entitled to benefits under this chapter shall receive training within 30 days of his employment, and again every two years thereafter, concerning the benefits available to himself or his beneficiary in case of disability or death in the line of duty. The Virginia Retirement System and the Department of Human Resource Management, in consultation with the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security, shall develop training information to be distributed to employers. The employer shall be responsible for providing the training. Such training shall not count toward in-service training requirements for law-enforcement officers pursuant to §

9.1-102

and shall include, but not be limited to, the general rules for intestate succession described in §

64.2-200

that may be applicable to the distribution of benefits provided under §

9.1-402

.

History.

2006, c. 535; 2014, cc. 115, 490; 2016, c. 677; 2017, c. 439.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 115, effective March 3, 2014, and by c. 490, effective April 2, 2014, inserted “and Homeland Security” in the second sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “within 30 days of his employment, and again every two years thereafter” in the first sentence; and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “Such training shall not count towards in-service training requirements for law-enforcement officers pursuant to §

9.1-102

.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 439 substituted “employee” for “law-enforcement or public safety officer” in the first sentence, inserted “Virginia Retirement System and the Department of Human Resource Management, in consultation with the” and substituted “employers” for “agencies and localities with employees subject to this chapter” in the second sentence and substituted “employer” for “agency or locality” in the third sentence.

§ 9.1-408.
Records of investigation confidential.

Evidence and documents obtained by or created by, and the report of investigation prepared by, the Department of State Police, the Virginia Retirement System, or the Department of Human Resource Management in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall (i) be deemed confidential, (ii) be exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), and (iii) not be released in whole or in part by any person to any person except as provided in this chapter. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, VRS may release to necessary parties such information, documents, and reports for purposes of administering appeals under this chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection A, the Department of State Police and the Department of Accounts shall, upon request, share with the Virginia Retirement System and the Department of Human Resource Management any information, evidence, documents, and reports of investigation related to existing and past claims for benefits provided under this Chapter. Such information, evidence, documents, and reports of investigation shall be exempt from disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

History.

2010, c. 568; 2017, c. 439.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 439, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and §

9.1-408

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, is in force from its passage [March 13, 2017].”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 439, effective March 13, 2017, inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B; in subsection A, inserted “the Virginia Retirement System, or the Department of Human Resource Management” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.